Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2910
Rules and regulations; Nebraska State Historical Society; Department of Revenue; joint report; contents.

(1) The Nebraska State Historical Society and the department may each adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act.

(2) The Nebraska State Historical Society and the department shall annually issue a joint report electronically to the Revenue Committee of the Legislature no later than December 31 of each year. The report shall include, but not be limited to, (a) the total number of applications submitted under the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act, (b) the number of applications approved or conditionally approved, (c) the number of applications outstanding, if any, (d) the number of applications denied and the basis for denial, (e) the total amount of eligible expenditures approved, (f) the total amount of credits issued, claimed, and still available for use, (g) the total amount of fees collected, (h) the name and address location of each historically significant real property identified in each application, whether approved or denied, (i) the total amount of credits transferred, sold, and assigned and a certification of the ownership of the credits, (j) the total amount of credits claimed against each tax type by category, and (k) the total amount of credits recaptured, if any. No information shall be provided in the report that is protected by state or federal confidentiality laws.

Laws 2014, LB191, § 10;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 82.